Maryland, session 2025, HB0280.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Criminal Law
7–106.1.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “MAIL OR PACKAGE” MEANS AN ITEM DELIVERED OR
LEFT TO BE COLLECTED BY THE UNITED STATES POSTAL SERVICE OR A DELIVERY
SERVICE COMPANY THAT DELIVERS TANGIBLE PERSONAL PROPERTY.
(B) A PERSON MAY NOT KNOWINGLY OR WILLFULLY AND WITHOUT
PERMISSION OF THE INTENDED RECIPIENT OF THE MAIL OR PACKAGE OBTAIN OR
EXERT CONTROL OVER MAIL OR A PACKAGE DELIVERED TO ANOTHER WITH THE
INTENT TO DEPRIVE THE OWNER OF THE MAIL OR PACKAGE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0280*

HOUSE BILL 280
(C) A PERSON WHO VIOLATES THIS SECTION IS GUILTY OF A FELONY AND
ON CONVICTION:
(1) SHALL BE ORDERED BY THE COURT TO:
(I) RESTORE THE MAIL OR PACKAGE TO THE PERSON TO WHOM
THE MAIL OR PACKAGE IS ADDRESSED; OR
(II) PAY RESTITUTION FOR THE VALUE OF THE MAIL OR
PACKAGE UNDER TITLE 11, SUBTITLE 6 OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE ARTICLE;
AND
(2) FOR A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT OFFENSE, IS SUBJECT TO
IMPRISONMENT FOR NOT LESS THAN 6 MONTHS AND NOT EXCEEDING 3 YEARS OR A
FINE NOT EXCEEDING $1,500 OR BOTH.
(D) AS A CONDITION OF SENTENCING FOR A THIRD OR SUBSEQUENT
CONVICTION UNDER THIS SECTION, THE COURT MAY ORDER THE DEFENDANT TO
UNDERGO EVALUATION AND TREATMENT FOR A SUBSTANCE USE DISORDER.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.